dev/postposition/postposition.ne.dix
  <!-- पश्चिमपट्टि; पश्चिमपट्टि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पश्चिमपट्टि__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भन्ने; भन्ने; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भन्ने__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लगि; लगि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लगि__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मै; मै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सदृस; सदृस; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सदृस__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तल; तल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तल__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अघिल्तिर; अघिल्तिर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अघिल्तिर__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वारि; वारि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वारि__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पर्यन्त; पर्यन्त; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पर्यन्त__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बिना; बिना; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बिना__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वमोजीम; वमोजीम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वमोजीम__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वरिपरि; वरिपरि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वरिपरि__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- देखि; देखि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="देखि__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मूनि; मूनि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मूनि__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- निमित्त; निमित्त; 1 -->
    <pardef n="निमित्त__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चाहिं; चाहिं; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चाहिं__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वीच; वीच; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वीच__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अतिरिक्त; अतिरिक्त; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अतिरिक्त__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- संग; संग; 1 -->
    <pardef n="संग__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तदनन्तर; तदनन्तर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तदनन्तर__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भीड; भीड; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भीड__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सगै; सगै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सगै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सँगसँगै; सँगसँगै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सँगसँगै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- साथसाथै; साथसाथै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="साथसाथै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वित्तिकै; वित्तिकै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वित्तिकै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चाँही; चाँही; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चाँही__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- देहाय; देहाय; 1 -->
    <pardef n="देहाय__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- समिप; समिप; 1 -->
    <pardef n="समिप__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- साथ-साथै; साथ-साथै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="साथ-साथै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वाट; वाट; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वाट__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पछाडि; पछाडि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पछाडि__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फेर; फेर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फेर__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सम्बन्धी; सम्बन्धी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सम्बन्धी__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पूर्वक; पूर्वक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पूर्वक__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दौरान; दौरान; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दौरान__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मार्फत; मार्फत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मार्फत__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विरुद्ध; विरुद्ध; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विरुद्ध__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- संम; संम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="संम__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- साथै; साथै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="साथै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वाला; वाला; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वाला__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नजिक; नजिक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नजिक__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- युक्त; युक्त; 1 -->
    <pardef n="युक्त__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बिरूद्ध; बिरूद्ध; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बिरूद्ध__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- -माझ; -माझ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="-माझ__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वाहेक; वाहेक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वाहेक__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पूर्व; पूर्व; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पूर्व__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="पश्चिमपट्टि"><i>पश्चिमपट्टि</i><par n="पश्चिमपट्टि__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="भन्ने"><i>भन्ने</i><par n="भन्ने__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="लगि"><i>लगि</i><par n="लगि__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="मै"><i>मै</i><par n="मै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="सदृस"><i>सदृस</i><par n="सदृस__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="तल"><i>तल</i><par n="तल__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="अघिल्तिर"><i>अघिल्तिर</i><par n="अघिल्तिर__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="वारि"><i>वारि</i><par n="वारि__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="पर्यन्त"><i>पर्यन्त</i><par n="पर्यन्त__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="बिना"><i>बिना</i><par n="बिना__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="वमोजीम"><i>वमोजीम</i><par n="वमोजीम__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="वरिपरि"><i>वरिपरि</i><par n="वरिपरि__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="देखि"><i>देखि</i><par n="देखि__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="मूनि"><i>मूनि</i><par n="मूनि__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="निमित्त"><i>निमित्त</i><par n="निमित्त__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="चाहिं"><i>चाहिं</i><par n="चाहिं__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="वीच"><i>वीच</i><par n="वीच__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="अतिरिक्त"><i>अतिरिक्त</i><par n="अतिरिक्त__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="संग"><i>संग</i><par n="संग__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="तदनन्तर"><i>तदनन्तर</i><par n="तदनन्तर__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="भीड"><i>भीड</i><par n="भीड__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="सगै"><i>सगै</i><par n="सगै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="सँगसँगै"><i>सँगसँगै</i><par n="सँगसँगै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="साथसाथै"><i>साथसाथै</i><par n="साथसाथै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="वित्तिकै"><i>वित्तिकै</i><par n="वित्तिकै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="चाँही"><i>चाँही</i><par n="चाँही__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="देहाय"><i>देहाय</i><par n="देहाय__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="समिप"><i>समिप</i><par n="समिप__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="साथ-साथै"><i>साथ-साथै</i><par n="साथ-साथै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="वाट"><i>वाट</i><par n="वाट__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="पछाडि"><i>पछाडि</i><par n="पछाडि__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="फेर"><i>फेर</i><par n="फेर__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="सम्बन्धी"><i>सम्बन्धी</i><par n="सम्बन्धी__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="पूर्वक"><i>पूर्वक</i><par n="पूर्वक__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="दौरान"><i>दौरान</i><par n="दौरान__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="मार्फत"><i>मार्फत</i><par n="मार्फत__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="विरुद्ध"><i>विरुद्ध</i><par n="विरुद्ध__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="संम"><i>संम</i><par n="संम__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="साथै"><i>साथै</i><par n="साथै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="वाला"><i>वाला</i><par n="वाला__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="नजिक"><i>नजिक</i><par n="नजिक__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="युक्त"><i>युक्त</i><par n="युक्त__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="बिरूद्ध"><i>बिरूद्ध</i><par n="बिरूद्ध__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="-माझ"><i>-माझ</i><par n="-माझ__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="वाहेक"><i>वाहेक</i><par n="वाहेक__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="पूर्व"><i>पूर्व</i><par n="पूर्व__pst"/></e>
